Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3219
Board; meetings; time; place; notice.

(1) The board shall hold regularly scheduled monthly meetings. A majority of the voting members of the board shall constitute a quorum, and the concurrence of a majority of a quorum shall be sufficient to take action and make determinations. Within ninety days after the creation of any natural resources district, the board thereof shall, by appropriate rules and regulations, designate the regular time and place such meetings are to be held. At the first meeting of each year, the board shall review its program for the preceding year and outline its plans for the following year. At the first regularly scheduled meeting after the completion of the yearly audit required by section 2-3223, it shall present a report of the financial condition of the district and open discussion relevant to the same. Notice shall be given of all board meetings pursuant to section 84-1411.

(2) The boards of directors of the natural resources districts within each river basin shall meet jointly at least twice a year at such times and places as may be mutually agreed upon for the purpose of receiving and coordinating their efforts for the maximum benefit of the basin.

Laws 1969, c. 9, § 19, p. 113;

Laws 1972, LB 543, § 10;

Laws 1988, LB 812, § 1;

Laws 1994, LB 480, § 6;

Laws 1998, LB 896, § 4;

Laws 1999, LB 436, § 2.